src/import/final_components.lexc
LEXICON FinalComponents

  @R.POS.IntNum@@R.Case.Nom@ AdjAfterNumeralNom ;
  @R.POS.IntNum@@R.Case.Gen@@P.POS.Adv@ AdvAfterNumeral ;
  @R.POS.N@@P.POS.N@@C.Der@@C.Stem@ NounFinalComp ;  ! insufficient flag diacritics
  @R.POS.N@@R.Case.Nom@@P.POS.Adv@@C.Der@@C.Stem@ AdvAfterNounNom ;
  @R.POS.N@@R.Case.Gen@@P.POS.Adv@@C.Der@@C.Stem@ AdvAfterNounGen ;
  @R.POS.N@@R.Case.Par@@P.POS.Adv@@C.Der@@C.Stem@ AdvAfterNounPar ;
  @R.POS.GA@@P.POS.A@ AdjAfterGenAttrib ;
  @R.POS.A@@R.Case.Gen@@P.POS.A@@C.Der@@C.Stem@ AdjAfterAdjGen ;
  @R.POS.AComp@@R.Case.Gen@@P.POS.A@@C.Der@@C.Stem@ AdjAfterAdjGen ;
  @R.POS.AComp@@R.Case.Short@@P.POS.A@@C.Der@@C.Stem@ VäärtFinal ;

LEXICON AdjAfterNumeralNom

keelne+A:k˘eelne SOOLANE  "weight: 10 " ; 
meelne+A:m˘eelne SOOLANE  "weight: 11 " ; 
nurkne+A:n˘urkne SOOLANE  "weight: 11 " ; 

LEXICON AdvAfterNumeral

kaupa+Adv:k˘aupa #  "weight: 7 " ; 
